Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2902
Site acquisition; purpose.

Any county in the State of Nebraska is hereby authorized to acquire a site or sites for and to equip a county community building or buildings for housing county enterprises and community activities and for social, athletic, and recreational purposes.

Laws 1977, LB 29, § 2.